Massachusetts, session 194th, H2523.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the
department of public health shall promulgate regulations to require that, subject to appropriation,
all child care programs, as licensed or authorized by the department of early education and care,
and public schools undergo routine radon testing. Testing schedules, documentation of testing,
standards for acceptable radon levels and plans for mitigation of unacceptable levels of radon
shall be determined, and made public, by the department of public health within 1 year of the
enactment of this bill.
of 1